South Dakota, session 2026, HB1133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 13-39A-43 be AMENDED:
13-39A-43. Except as otherwise provided in § 13-39A-44, neither the South
Dakota Board of Technical Education nor any institution under the control of the board
may restrict or limit the lawful carrying, possession, storage, or transportation of:
(1) A concealed pistol, as defined in § 22-1-2, and compatible ammunition, by any
individual holding an enhanced permit, a restricted enhanced permit, or a
reciprocal permit in accordance with chapter 23-7, within the boundaries of the
institution, or while in any building or structure owned or leased by the board or
the institution;
(2) A stun gun, as defined in § 22-1-2, by any individual within the boundaries of the
institution, or while in any building or structure owned or leased by the board or
the institution; or
(3) Mace, pepper spray, or other chemical irritant by any individual within the
boundaries of the institution, or while in any building or structure owned or leased
by the board or the institution.
Section 2. That § 13-53-56 be AMENDED:
13-53-56. Except as otherwise provided in § 13-53-57, neither the Board of
Regents nor any institution under the control of the board may restrict or limit the lawful
carrying, possession, storage, or transportation of:
(1) A concealed pistol, as defined in § 22-1-2, and compatible ammunition, by any
individual holding an enhanced permit, a restricted enhanced permit, or a
reciprocal permit in accordance with chapter 23-7, within the boundaries of the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.501.9 2 1133
institution, or while in any building or structure owned or leased by the board or
the institution;
(2) A stun gun, as defined in § 22-1-2, by any individual within the boundaries of the
institution, or while in any building or structure owned or leased by the board or
the institution; or
(3) Mace, pepper spray, or other chemical irritant by any individual within the
boundaries of the institution, or while in any building or structure owned or leased
by the board or the institution.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.